Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB896.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Cannabinoid" means a compound found in the hemp plant Cannabis sativa L.
from a United States Department of Agriculture sanctioned domestic hemp
production program or a Kentucky sanctioned hemp-derived cannabinoid
product program;
(2) "Cannabis":
(a) Means marijuana as defined in Section 7 of this Act when cultivated,
harvested, processed, produced, transported, dispensed, distributed, sold,
possessed, or used in accordance with this chapter;
(b) Includes cannabis products; and
(c) Does not include:
1. Industrial hemp or industrial hemp products;
2. Hemp or hemp-derived cannabinoids; and
3. Medicinal cannabis as defined in Section 8 of this Act;
(3) "Cannabis-infused beverage":
(a) Means a properly permitted adult-use cannabinoid liquid product intended
for human consumption that has intoxicating properties that change the
function of the nervous system and results in alterations of perception,
cognition, or behavior;
(b) Shall not contain more than five (5) milligrams of adult-use cannabinoids
per twelve (12) ounce serving, within a twenty percent (20%) variance or a
variance established by the department, whichever is lower; and
(c) Shall not include:
Page 1 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
1. Medicinal cannabis defined in Section 8 of this Act
2. Any type of hemp tincture; and
3. Any product containing solely nonintoxicating cannabinoids;
(4) "Department" means the Department for Public Health;
(5) "Final hemp-derived cannabinoid product":
(a) Means any final product derived from hemp that:
1. Contains cannabinoids in any form;
2. Is intended for human or animal use through any means of
application or administration, such as inhalation, ingestion, or topical
application; and
(b) Shall not include:
1. Hemp cigarettes;
2. Hemp cigars;
3. Chew, dip, or other smokeless material consisting of hemp leaf
material or hemp floral material; and
4. Hemp leaf material or floral material teas;
(6) "Hemp":
(a) Means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the
seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids,
salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a total
tetrahydrocannabinols concentration, including tetrahydrocannabinolic
acid, concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on
a dry weight basis; and
(b) Does not include medicinal cannabis as defined in Section 8 of this Act;
(7) "Hemp-derived cannabinoid product" means any intermediate hemp-derived
cannabinoid product or final hemp-derived cannabinoid product;
(8) "Hemp products" or "industrial hemp products":
Page 2 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(a) Means products derived from, or made by, processing hemp plants or plant
parts; and
(b) Does not include medicinal cannabis products as defined in Section 8 of
this Act;
(9) "Industrial hemp" means hemp:
(a) Grown for the use of the stalk of the plant, fiber produced from such a stalk,
or any other non-cannabinoid derivative, mixture, preparation, or
manufacture of such a stalk;
(b) Grown for the use of the whole grain, oil, cake, nut, hull, or any other non-
cannabinoid compound, derivative, mixture, preparation, or manufacture of
the seeds of such plant;
(c) Grown for purposes of producing microgreens or other edible hemp leaf
products intended for human consumption that are derived from an
immature hemp plant that is grown from seeds that do not exceed a total
tetrahydrocannabinols concentration, including tetrahydrocannabinolic
acid, of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) in the plant on a dry weight
basis;
(d) That does not enter the stream of commerce and is intended to support
hemp research at an institution of higher education or an independent
research institute; or
(e) Grown for the use of a viable seed of the plant produced solely for the
production or manufacture of any material described in paragraphs (a)
through (d) of this subsection;
(10) "Intermediate hemp-derived product" means a hemp-derived cannabinoid
product that is:
(a) Not yet in the final form or preparation marketed or intended to be used or
consumed by a human or animal; or
Page 3 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(b) A powder, liquid, tablet, oil, or other product form which is intended or
marketed to be mixed, dissolved, formulated, or otherwise added to or
prepared with or into any other substance prior to administration or
consumption;
(11) "Kentucky sanctioned hemp-derived cannabinoid product program" means a
state regulatory framework under the Department for Public Health or the
Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control that oversees the legal processing,
manufacturing, testing, distribution, and retail sales of hemp-derived
cannabinoid products;
(12) "License" means any license issued under this chapter;
(13) "Licensee" means any holder of a license issued by the department under this
chapter;
(14) "Marketing" means promoting or selling a product within the Commonwealth, in
another state, or outside of the United States. Marketing includes efforts to
advertise and gather information about the needs or preferences of potential
consumers or suppliers, but shall not include these actions if they are part of
legitimate scholarly research or studies;
(15) "Premises" means the land, buildings, and vehicles in which any business
regulated by this chapter is operated or performed;
(16) "Processing" means converting an agricultural commodity into a marketable
form;
(17) "THC" means total tetrahydrocannabinol, Delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, Delta-
10 tetrahydrocannabinol, and the optical isomer of these substances; and any
other cannabinoids that have similar effects, or are marketed to have similar
effects, on humans or animals as a tetrahydrocannabinol, as determined by the
department;
(18) "Total Tetrahydrocannabinol" means the sum of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol
Page 4 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(delta-9 THC) and 87.7% of the delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinolic acid (THCA)
concentration; and
(19) "University" means an accredited institution of higher education located in the
Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Certified reference materials" means highly accurate, stable, and
homogenous substances with documented traceability to SI units, used to
evaluate methods and to ensure measurement quality;
(b) "Department" means the Department for Public Health;
(c) "Fit-for-purpose" means a validated test procedure that is suitable,
functional, and effective for its intended use and meets required standards;
(d) "Proficiency test" means a test established to evaluate the ability of a
laboratory to perform test procedures required under this section by
comparing each laboratory’s results against a set of standards;
(e) "Proficiency test sample" means an unknown substance sent by an
approved, external provider to a laboratory for analysis to evaluate
accuracy, precision, and performance. Proficiency test samples are
submitted blindly for testing using the same methods as are used for
regular, routine samples to assess the ability of the laboratory to produce
valid results; and
(f) "Third-party laboratory" means an independent, impartial testing entity not
affiliated with a manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or any other seller or
buyer of a hemp-derived cannabinoid product.
(2) The department shall work to improve testing procedures, proficiency testing, and
approvals of third-party laboratories who seek to test registered hemp-derived
Page 5 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
cannabinoid products for sale in Kentucky.
(3) Third-party laboratories certified to test registered hemp-derived cannabinoid
products shall meet the following requirements:
(a) Accreditation under ISO/IEC 17025:2017 standard by an ISO-certified
accreditation body, including accreditation for each method used for testing
hemp-derived cannabinoid products;
(b) Comprehensive quality systems and validated methods for testing hemp-
derived cannabinoids using both Gas Chromatography-Mass Spectrometry
(GC-MS/ or GC-MS/MS) and High-Performance Liquid Chromatography
(HPLC-PDA or LC-MS/MS) systems;
(c) Establishing standard operating procedures and methodologies for testing
products containing hemp-derived cannabinoids that are fit-for-purpose;
(d) Utilizing fit-for-purpose testing for plant material, oils, edibles, beverages,
and vaporizable products;
(e) Participating in an accredited proficiency testing program under ISO/IEC
17043; and
(f) Meeting other standards necessary to fulfill the requirements of this section.
(4) (a) The department shall establish a proficiency test for demonstrating
proficiency in testing hemp-derived cannabinoids for the purpose of
evaluating and approving third-party laboratories that seek to conduct
compliance testing of hemp-derived cannabinoid products registered in the
Commonwealth.
(b) The department shall establish the proficiency test. The department shall
utilize certified reference materials to create a reference product for
compliance testing. The reference product shall include the following
cannabinoids:
1. Cannabidiol (CBD) (CAS # 13956-29-1);
Page 6 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
2. Cannabinol (CBN) (CAS # 521-35-7);
3. Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid (THCA) (CAS # 23978-85-0);
4. Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-9-THC) (CAS # 1972-08-3);
5. Delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-8-THC) (CAS # 5757-75-5);
6. Hexahydrocannabinol (HHC) (CAS # 36403-90-4 for 9(R)-HHC and
36403-91-5 for 9(S)-HHC);
7. Delta-8-iso-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-8-iso-THC) (CAS # 23050-47-
7);
8. Delta-4,8-iso-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta 4(8)-iso-THC) (CAS #
23050-59-1);
9. 9(R) Hexahydrocannabinol (9(R)-HHC) (CAS # 23050-47-7); and
10. 9(S) Hexahydrocannabinol (9(S)-HHC) (CAS # 36403-91-5).
(c) The proficiency test samples shall be of known concentration, preparation
documented, and maintained by the department for purposes of proficiency
testing and periodic validation.
(5) Upon establishing the proficiency test, the department shall establish an approval
process for third-party laboratories seeking to conduct testing of hemp-derived
cannabinoid products intended for registration in the Commonwealth in
accordance with the following:
(a) The department shall provide proficiency test materials to any third-party
laboratory that seeks approval to conduct cannabinoid testing for hemp-
derived cannabinoid products intended for registration in Kentucky;
(b) Participating third-party laboratories shall test each proficiency sample
using the validated methods and analytical procedures that are within their
scope of accreditation as specified on their accreditation certificate and
submit their results to the department within a timeframe established by the
department;
Page 7 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(c) The department shall compare the proficiency test results submitted by
third-party laboratories to target values and to the results derived from the
same reference materials by other certified laboratories. The results from
each applicant laboratory for each analyte shall be assigned a z-score;
(d) 1. A third-party laboratory shall be approved for inclusion on the
Commonwealth’s list of approved laboratories if its results fall within
an acceptable range established by the department through the
promulgation of administrative regulations.
2. To be eligible for approval under this section, a third-party laboratory
shall maintain accreditation under ISO/IEC 17025:2017 or its
successor standard and shall provide proof of such accreditation to the
department.
3. The department may establish additional requirements for third-party
laboratories seeking approval within the Commonwealth through an
administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A; and
(e) The department shall create and maintain a publicly available list of
approved laboratories that meet requirements established under this section.
(6) Upon establishment of the approved laboratory list:
(a) Any person or entity registering hemp-derived cannabinoid-containing
products in Kentucky shall utilize a laboratory included on the department's
approved laboratory list; and
(b) All previously registered products containing cannabinoids shall be re-
registered with the department to continue selling in the Commonwealth.
Any registration fees associated with this re-registration requirement shall
be waived.
(7) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
Page 8 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
KRS Chapter 13A to implement and enforce this section, including but not
limited to:
(a) Defining acceptable variance ranges for proficiency testing;
(b) Establishing timelines for laboratory participation and review;
(c) Establishing procedures for adding or removing laboratories from the
approved list;
(d) Specifying recordkeeping and reporting requirements; and
(e) Determining a timeframe for allowing registered businesses to re-register
products using the approved laboratories for retesting certified products to
assure conformance to hemp-derived cannabinoid standards.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The use of hemp-derived cannabinoid products shall be considered lawful if
done in accordance with:
1. This chapter and any administrative regulations promulgated
thereunder; and
2. Any administrative regulations promulgated by the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services, Alcoholic Beverage Control, or the Kentucky
Department of Agriculture;
(b) The acquisition, blending, cultivation, delivery, distribution, manufacturing,
manipulation, packaging for sale, preparation, possession, sale, testing,
transportation, or transfer of hemp-derived cannabinoid products or hemp-
derived cannabinoid product accessories by a licensed business or licensed
business agent shall be considered lawful if done in accordance with this
chapter and any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder;
Page 9 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(c) An attorney shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to
arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or
privilege, including but not limited to a civil penalty or disciplinary action
by the Kentucky Court of Justice, Kentucky Bar Association, or by any
other professional licensing board, solely for providing an individual or
hemp-derived cannabinoid business with legal assistance related to activity
that is no longer subject to criminal penalties under state law pursuant to
this chapter; and
(d) A person shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to
arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or
privilege, including but not limited to a civil penalty or disciplinary action
by an occupational or professional licensing board, solely for providing
assistance or services, including but not limited to accounting services,
financial services, security services, or business consulting services, to any
individual or hemp-derived cannabinoid business related to activity that is
no longer subject to criminal penalties under state law pursuant to this
chapter.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be construed or interpreted to prohibit the
arrest, prosecution, or imposition of any other penalty arising from but not
limited to breach of contract, breach of fiduciary duty, negligence, or engaging in
criminal activity that would constitute a felony or misdemeanor.
Section 4. KRS 260.8635 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS
Chapter 217, and amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "location" means a single contiguous parcel of land and any
buildings situated thereon.
(2) A[No] person shall not move or transport, or aid or abet another person in moving
or transporting, any intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid product[hemp extract
Page 10 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
material] having a[ delta-9] tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in excess of three-
tenths of one percent (0.3%):
(a) From any location outside the Commonwealth to any location within the
Commonwealth;
(b) From any location inside the Commonwealth to any location outside the
Commonwealth;[ or]
(c) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, from any location inside
the Commonwealth to any other location inside the Commonwealth; or
(d) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) A[ licensed] processor or manufacturer licensed by the Department for Public
Health, or a person acting as a representative of a licensed processor or
manufacturer, may move or transport intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid
product[hemp extract material] having a[ delta-9] tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration in excess of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) from one (1) licensed
processing location in the Commonwealth to another licensed[ processing] location
in the Commonwealth, provided that:
(a) The intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products[hemp extract material]
shall move directly from one (1) licensed[ processing] location to another; and
(b) The licensee[licensed processor] shall provide written notice to the
department of the planned movement at least twenty-four (24) hours in
advance to include the following information:
1. The date of the movement;
2. The address of the origin;
3. The address of the destination; and
4. Other information required by the department.
(4) A licensed processor or manufacturer, or a person acting as a representative of a
licensed processor or manufacturer, may move or transport intermediate hemp-
Page 11 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
derived cannabinoid products having a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in
excess of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) from one (1) licensed location to
another licensed location if:
(a) The intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products move directly from
one (1) licensed location to another;
(b) The licensee provides written notice to the department of the planned
movement at least twenty-four (24) hours in advance to include the
following information:
1. The date of the movement;
2. The address of the origin;
3. The address of the destination; and
4. Other information required by the department; and
(c) The intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products are transported from
the Commonwealth to a license holder in another state where that state
allows the transport of the intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products
from another state and the transportation is not transported through a state
that does not permit such transport.
Section 5. KRS 138.870 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 138.870 to 138.889, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Controlled substance" means any controlled substance, whether real or counterfeit,
as defined in KRS 218A.010 or any regulation promulgated thereunder, except that
it shall not include marijuana, hemp-derived cannabinoid products as defined in
Section 1 of this Act, or medicinal cannabis;
(2) "Dosage unit" means a tablet, capsule, vial, or ampule of a controlled substance or,
in cases of mass volume or diluted quantities, the proper dose or quantity of a
controlled substance to be taken all at one (1) time or in fractional amounts within a
given period, as defined and adopted by the United States Pharmacopeia;
Page 12 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(3) "Marijuana":
(a) Means marijuana, whether real or counterfeit, as defined in KRS 218A.010;[
and]
(b) Does not include medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010; and
(c) Does not include hemp-derived cannabinoid products as defined in Section
1 of this Act;
(4) "Offender" means a person who engages in this state in a taxable activity as defined
in subsection (6) of this section;
(5) "Possessing" includes either actual possession or constructive possession, or a
combination of both actual and constructive possession. Mere possession or
ownership of real estate or an interest therein does not establish constructive
possession; and
(6) "Taxable activity" means producing, cultivating, manufacturing, importing,
transporting, distributing, acquiring, purchasing, storing, selling, using, or otherwise
possessing, in violation of KRS Chapter 218A, more than five (5) marijuana plants
with foliation, 42.5 grams of marijuana which has been detached from the plant on
which it grew, seven (7) grams of any controlled substance, or fifty (50) or more
dosage units of any controlled substance which is not sold by weight. The weight or
dosage units in this subsection shall include the weight of marijuana or the weight
or dosage units of the controlled substance, whether pure, impure, or diluted. A
quantity of a controlled substance is diluted if it consists of a detectable quantity of
a pure controlled substance and any excipients or fillers.
Section 6. KRS 217.039 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a)[ "Cannabidiol" means a non-psychoactive cannabinoid found in the hemp
plant Cannabis sativa which has the chemical name 2-[(1R,6R)-3-methyl-6-
prop-1-en-2-ylcyclohex-2-en-1-yl]-5-pentylbenzene-1,3-diol;
Page 13 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(b)] "Certificate of analysis" means a document produced by a laboratory that has
been accredited pursuant to standards of the International Organization for
Standardization, attesting to the composition of a product. The certificate of
analysis shall include but not be limited to the amount of:
1. Delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol;
2. [, the amount of ]Other cannabinoids;
3. [, the amount of ]Pesticide residues;
4. [, the amount of ]Heavy metal traces;
5. [, the amount of ]Mycotoxin contaminants;
6. [, the amount of ]Residual solvents;[,] and
7. [the amount of ]Microbiological contaminants;
(b)[(c)] "Hemp" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act[KRS
260.850]; and
(c)[(d)] "Quick response code" or "QR code" means a type of machine-readable,
two (2) dimensional bar code that stores information about a product.
(2) A manufacturer or processor of hemp-derived cannabinoid[ingestible or cosmetic
cannabidiol] products located in Kentucky shall:
(a) Be permitted as a food manufacturer or a cosmetic manufacturer by the
cabinet and shall provide the following information:
1. The name of the manufacturer or processor and the physical address
where production or processing occurs; and
2. A listing of the hemp-derived cannabinoid[cannabidiol] products to be
produced or processed; and
(b) Obtain a certificate of analysis for all hemp-derived
cannabinoid[cannabidiol] products to be sold or otherwise distributed in the
Commonwealth.
(3) All ingestible or cosmetic hemp-derived cannabinoid[cannabidiol] products sold or
Page 14 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
otherwise distributed in the Commonwealth shall bear labeling to allow the
consumer to access information on the product, including a certificate of analysis
for the product[, the location where the hemp was grown,] and the address and
phone number of the manufacturer or distributor using the following:
(a) A scannable bar code, including the batch number or serial number of the
product;
(b) A QR code; or
(c) A web address linked to a document or website.
(4) Any product labeling or advertising material for any ingestible or cosmetic hemp-
derived cannabinoid[cannabidiol] product sold or otherwise distributed in the
Commonwealth shall not bear any claims stating that the product can diagnose,
treat, cure, or prevent any disease.
(5) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish labeling requirements for ingestible or cosmetic hemp-
derived cannabinoid[cannabidiol] products in accordance with of this section.
(6) The following hemp-derived cannabinoids are prohibited from commerce without
prior authorization from the department:
(a) Hexahydrocannabinols (HHC);
(b) Hexahyrdocannabiphorol (HHC-P);
(c) Tetrahydrocannabinol acetates and other esters;
(d) Exo-Tetrahydrocannabinol (Exo-THC);
(e) Tetrahydrocannabiphorols (THCP);
(f) Tetrahydrocannabioctyls (THC-c8);
(g) 11-hydroxy-Tetrahydrocannabinol (11-OH-THC); and
(h) Other cannabinoids determined by the department to be subject to pre-
authorization.
(7) On and after the effective date of this Act:
Page 15 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(a) The cabinet shall regulate and license manufacturers of cannabis-infused
beverages.
(b) After the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control has promulgated
administrative regulations under KRS 243.401 or July 1, 2026, whichever is
earlier, this section shall not apply to any distributor or retailer of cannabis-
infused beverages licensed under KRS Chapters 241 to 244. The distribution
and retail sale of cannabis-infused beverages shall then be regulated solely by
the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control under KRS Chapter 243 and
the administrative regulations promulgated thereto, except that:
1. On its licensed premises, a manufacturer licensed by the cabinet shall
be authorized to sell cannabis-infused beverages by the package
without an additional cannabis-infused beverage package license
issued by the Department of Alcohol Beverage Control, so long as the
beverages are sold under a brand name owned or exclusively licensed
to the manufacturer, if the beverages were:
a. Produced by the manufacturer;
b. Produced for the manufacturer under a written contract with
another manufacturer; or
c. Bottled or canned for or by the manufacturer; and
2. A retailer licensed by the cabinet may sell cannabis-infused beverages
by the package, on its licensed premises, without an additional
cannabis-infused beverage package license issued by the Department
of Alcohol Beverage Control, except that:
a. To sell cannabis-infused beverages, the licensee shall derive
fifty-one percent (51%) of its revenue from the sale of hemp-
derived cannabinoid products, as reported to and approved by
the cabinet, and
Page 16 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
b. The retailer shall purchase the cannabis-infused beverages from
a licensed cannabis-infused beverage distributor or from a
cannabis-infused beverage manufacturer authorized to self-
distribute under KRS 243.401.
(8) A person shall not process or manufacture hemp-derived cannabinoid products
in the Commonwealth unless the person holds a license issued by the Department
for Public Health.
(9) Any person seeking to process, manufacture, or retail hemp shall provide to the
department prior written consent allowing representatives of the department or
the Department of Kentucky State Police, and other state and local law
enforcement agencies to enter onto all premises where hemp is processed,
manufactured, or stored for the purpose of conducting physical inspections or
ensuring compliance with the requirements of KRS 260.850 to 260.869 and
administrative regulations promulgated by the department.
(10) It is unlawful for a person who does not hold a processor or manufacturer license
issued by the Department for Public Health, or who is not an agent of a licensee,
to possess intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid product having a total
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in excess of three-tenths of one percent
(0.3%). Penalties for persons who possess such intermediate hemp-derived
cannabinoid products without a license are the same as those penalties that are
applicable to persons who violate KRS Chapter 218A, relating to marijuana.
(11) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the holder of a cannabis-infused
beverage retail package license, a cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license,
or a cannabis-infused beverage manufacturer license as approved by the
Department for Public Health may sell and serve complimentary samples of
cannabis- infused beverages at fairs, festivals, and other similar types of events in
wet territory, under the following circumstances:
Page 17 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(a) Sales by the drink;
(b) Sales by the package shall not exceed nine (9) liters per person, per day;
(c) Complimentary samples served by the drink shall not exceed one and three-
fourths (1.75) ounces per person, per day; and
(d) The cannabis-infused beverages shall have been lawfully produced or
purchased by the license holder.
Section 7. KRS 218A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or
research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or by his or her authorized agent under his or her immediate
supervision and pursuant to his or her order; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the
practitioner;
(2) "Anabolic steroid" means any drug or hormonal substance chemically and
pharmacologically related to testosterone that promotes muscle growth and includes
those substances classified as Schedule III controlled substances pursuant to KRS
218A.020 but does not include estrogens, progestins, and anticosteroids;
(3) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(4) "Carfentanil" means any substance containing any quantity of carfentanil, or any of
its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(5) "Certified community based palliative care program" means a palliative care
program which has received certification from the Joint Commission;
(6) "Child" means any person under the age of majority as specified in KRS 2.015;
(7) "Cocaine" means a substance containing any quantity of cocaine, its salts, optical
and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
Page 18 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(8) "Controlled substance" means methamphetamine, or a drug, substance, or
immediate precursor in Schedules I through V and includes a controlled substance
analogue;
(9) (a) "Controlled substance analogue," except as provided in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, means a substance:
1. The chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the structure
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II; and
2. Which has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater than the
stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II; or
3. With respect to a particular person, which such person represents or
intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater than the
stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II.
(b) Such term does not include:
1. Any substance for which there is an approved new drug application;
2. With respect to a particular person, any substance if an exemption is in
effect for investigational use for that person pursuant to federal law to
the extent conduct with respect to such substance is pursuant to such
exemption; or
3. Any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before
the exemption described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph takes
effect with respect to that substance;
(10) "Counterfeit substance" means a controlled substance which, or the container or
labeling of which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other
Page 19 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
identifying mark, imprint, number, or device, or any likeness thereof, of a
manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other than the person who in fact
manufactured, distributed, or dispensed the substance;
(11) "Dispense" means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or research
subject by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the packaging,
labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery;
(12) "Dispenser" means a person who lawfully dispenses a Schedule II, III, IV, or V
controlled substance to or for the use of an ultimate user;
(13) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled
substance;
(14) "Dosage unit" means a single pill, capsule, ampule, liquid, or other form of
administration available as a single unit;
(15) "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States Pharmacopoeia,
official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National
Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, care, mitigation, treatment, or
prevention of disease in man or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of
the body of man or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in this
subsection.
It does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories;
(16) "Fentanyl" means a substance containing any quantity of fentanyl, or any of its
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(17) "Fentanyl derivative" means a substance containing any quantity of any chemical
compound, except compounds specifically scheduled as controlled substances by
Page 20 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
statute or by administrative regulation pursuant to this chapter, which is structurally
derived from 1-ethyl-4-(N-phenylamido) piperadine:
(a) By substitution:
1. At the 2-position of the 1-ethyl group with a phenyl, furan, thiophene, or
ethyloxotetrazole ring system; and
2. Of the terminal amido hydrogen atom with an alkyl, alkoxy, cycloalkyl,
or furanyl group; and
(b) Which may be further modified in one (1) or more of the following ways:
1. By substitution on the N-phenyl ring to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy,
haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents;
2. By substitution on the piperadine ring to any extent with alkyl, allyl,
alkoxy, hydroxy, or halide substituents at the 2-, 3-, 5-, and/or 6-
positions;
3. By substitution on the piperadine ring to any extent with a phenyl,
alkoxy, or carboxylate ester substituent at the 4- position; or
4. By substitution on the 1-ethyl group to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, or
hydroxy substituents;
(18) "Good-faith prior examination," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal
prosecution only, means an in-person medical examination of the patient conducted
by the prescribing practitioner or other health-care professional routinely relied
upon in the ordinary course of his or her practice, at which time the patient is
physically examined and a medical history of the patient is obtained. "In-person"
includes telehealth examinations. This subsection shall not be applicable to hospice
providers licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B;
(19) "Hazardous chemical substance" includes any chemical substance used or intended
for use in the illegal manufacture of a controlled substance as defined in this section
or the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine as defined in KRS 218A.1431,
Page 21 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
which:
(a) Poses an explosion hazard;
(b) Poses a fire hazard; or
(c) Is poisonous or injurious if handled, swallowed, or inhaled;
(20) "Heroin" means a substance containing any quantity of heroin, or any of its salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers;
(21) "Hydrocodone combination product" means a drug with:
(a) Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone, or any of
its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15)
milligrams per dosage unit, with a fourfold or greater quantity of an
isoquinoline alkaloid of opium; or
(b) Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone, or any of
its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15)
milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(22) "Immediate precursor" means a substance which is the principal compound
commonly used or produced primarily for use, and which is an immediate chemical
intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance
or methamphetamine, the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
manufacture;
(23) "Industrial hemp" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act[KRS 260.850];
(24) "Industrial hemp products" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act[KRS
260.850];
(25) "Intent to manufacture" means any evidence which demonstrates a person's
conscious objective to manufacture a controlled substance or methamphetamine.
Such evidence includes but is not limited to statements and a chemical substance's
usage, quantity, manner of storage, or proximity to other chemical substances or
Page 22 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
equipment used to manufacture a controlled substance or methamphetamine;
(26) "Isomer" means the optical isomer, except the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services may include the optical, positional, or geometric isomer to classify any
substance pursuant to KRS 218A.020;
(27) "Manufacture," except as provided in KRS 218A.1431, means the production,
preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled
substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural
origin or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of
the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container except that this term does not
include activities:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to his or her administering or dispensing of a
controlled substance in the course of his or her professional practice;
(b) By a practitioner, or by his or her authorized agent under his supervision, for
the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis
and not for sale; or
(c) By a pharmacist as an incident to his or her dispensing of a controlled
substance in the course of his or her professional practice;
(28) "Marijuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis sp., whether growing or not; the
seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin
or any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of these
substances. The term "marijuana" does not include:
(a) [Industrial ]Hemp that is in the possession, custody, or control of a person
who holds a license issued by the Department of Agriculture permitting that
person to cultivate or[,] handle[, or process industrial] hemp;
(b) Hemp or hemp-derived cannabinoid products that are in the possession,
Page 23 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
custody, or control of a person who holds a license issued by the
Department for Public Health or Department of Alcohol Beverage Control
permitting that person to handle, process, or retail hemp;
(c) [Industrial ]Hemp products that do not include any living plants, viable seeds,
leaf materials, or floral materials;
(d)[(c)] Hemp-derived cannabinoid products[The substance cannabidiol], when
transferred, dispensed, or administered pursuant to the written order of a
physician practicing at a hospital or associated clinic affiliated with a
Kentucky public university having a college or school of medicine;
(e)[(d)] For persons participating in a clinical trial or in an expanded access
program, a drug or substance approved for the use of those participants by the
United States Food and Drug Administration;
(f)[(e)] A final hemp-derived cannabinoid[cannabidiol] product[ derived from
industrial hemp,] as defined in Section 1 of this Act[KRS 260.850];
(g)[(f)] For the purpose of conducting scientific research, a cannabinoid product
derived from[ industrial] hemp, as defined in Section 1 of this Act[KRS
260.850];
(h)[(g)] A cannabinoid product approved as a prescription medication by the
United States Food and Drug Administration; or
(i)[(h)] Medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010;
(29) "Medical history," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only,
means an accounting of a patient's medical background, including but not limited to
prior medical conditions, prescriptions, and family background;
(30) "Medical order," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only,
means a lawful order of a specifically identified practitioner for a specifically
identified patient for the patient's health-care needs. "Medical order" may or may
not include a prescription drug order;
Page 24 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(31) "Medical record," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only,
means a record, other than for financial or billing purposes, relating to a patient,
kept by a practitioner as a result of the practitioner-patient relationship;
(32) "Methamphetamine" means any substance that contains any quantity of
methamphetamine, or any of its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(33) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly
by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of
chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
(a) Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of
opium or opiate;
(b) Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is
chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids
of opium;
(c) Opium poppy and poppy straw;
(d) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been
removed;
(e) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
(f) Ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; and
(g) Any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of any of
the substances referred to in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this subsection;
(34) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having
addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. It does not include, unless
specifically designated as controlled under KRS 218A.020, the dextrorotatory
isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). It does
Page 25 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
include its racemic and levorotatory forms;
(35) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species papaver somniferum L., except its
seeds;
(36) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision
or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal
entity;
(37) "Physical injury" has the same meaning it has in KRS 500.080;
(38) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing;
(39) "Pharmacist" means a natural person licensed by this state to engage in the practice
of the profession of pharmacy;
(40) "Practitioner" means a physician, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, scientific
investigator, optometrist as authorized in KRS 320.240, advanced practice
registered nurse as authorized under KRS 314.011, physician assistant as authorized
under KRS 311.858, or other person licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted by
state or federal law to acquire, distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to,
or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or
research in this state. "Practitioner" also includes a physician, dentist, podiatrist,
veterinarian, or advanced practice registered nurse authorized under KRS 314.011
who is a resident of and actively practicing in a state other than Kentucky and who
is licensed and has prescriptive authority for controlled substances under the
professional licensing laws of another state, unless the person's Kentucky license
has been revoked, suspended, restricted, or probated, in which case the terms of the
Kentucky license shall prevail;
(41) "Practitioner-patient relationship," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal
prosecution only, means a medical relationship that exists between a patient and a
practitioner or the practitioner's designee, after the practitioner or his or her
designee has conducted at least one (1) good-faith prior examination;
Page 26 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(42) "Prescription" means a written, electronic, or oral order for a drug or medicine, or
combination or mixture of drugs or medicines, or proprietary preparation, signed or
given or authorized by a medical, dental, chiropody, veterinarian, optometric
practitioner, or advanced practice registered nurse, and intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other
animals;
(43) "Prescription blank," with reference to a controlled substance, means a document
that meets the requirements of KRS 218A.204 and 217.216;
(44) "Presumptive probation" means a sentence of probation not to exceed the maximum
term specified for the offense, subject to conditions otherwise authorized by law,
that is presumed to be the appropriate sentence for certain offenses designated in
this chapter, notwithstanding contrary provisions of KRS Chapter 533. That
presumption shall only be overcome by a finding on the record by the sentencing
court of substantial and compelling reasons why the defendant cannot be safely and
effectively supervised in the community, is not amenable to community-based
treatment, or poses a significant risk to public safety;
(45) "Production" includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing, or harvesting
of a controlled substance;
(46) "Recovery program" means an evidence-based, nonclinical service that assists
individuals and families working toward sustained recovery from substance use and
other criminal risk factors. This can be done through an array of support programs
and services that are delivered through residential and nonresidential means;
(47) "Salvia" means Salvia divinorum or Salvinorin A and includes all parts of the plant
presently classified botanically as Salvia divinorum, whether growing or not, the
seeds thereof, any extract from any part of that plant, and every compound,
manufacture, derivative, mixture, or preparation of that plant, its seeds, or its
extracts, including salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of
Page 27 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation of that plant, its seeds, or extracts. The term shall not include any other
species in the genus salvia;
(48) "Second or subsequent offense" means that for the purposes of this chapter an
offense is considered as a second or subsequent offense, if, prior to his or her
conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted under this
chapter, or under any statute of the United States, or of any state relating to
substances classified as controlled substances or counterfeit substances, except that
a prior conviction for a nontrafficking offense shall be treated as a prior offense
only when the subsequent offense is a nontrafficking offense. For the purposes of
this section, a conviction voided under KRS 218A.275 or 218A.276 shall not
constitute a conviction under this chapter;
(49) "Sell" means to dispose of a controlled substance to another person for
consideration or in furtherance of commercial distribution;
(50) "Serious physical injury" has the same meaning it has in KRS 500.080;
(51) "Synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines" means any chemical compound which is
not approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved,
which is not dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal law, that
contains Benzylpiperazine (BZP); Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine (TFMPP); 1,1-
Dimethylheptyl-11-hydroxytetrahydrocannabinol (HU-210); 1-Butyl-3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole; 1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole; dexanabinol (HU-211); or any
compound in the following structural classes:
(a) Naphthoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
Page 28 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but
are not limited to JWH-015, JWH-018, JWH-019, JWH-073, JWH-081, JWH-
122, JWH-200, and AM-2201;
(b) Phenylacetylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-phenylacetylindole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are
not limited to JWH-167, JWH-250, JWH-251, and RCS-8;
(c) Benzoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole structure with
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are
not limited to AM-630, AM-2233, AM-694, Pravadoline (WIN 48,098), and
RCS-4;
(d) Cyclohexylphenols: Any compound containing a 2-(3-
hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with substitution at the 5-position of the
phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl
group whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to CP 47,497 and
its C8 homologue (cannabicyclohexanol);
(e) Naphthylmethylindoles: Any compound containing a 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-
naphthyl)methane structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
Page 29 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether
or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to JWH-175, JWH-184, and JWH-185;
(f) Naphthoylpyrroles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but
are not limited to JWH-030, JWH-145, JWH-146, JWH-307, and JWH-368;
(g) Naphthylmethylindenes: Any compound containing a 1-(1-
naphthylmethyl)indene structure with substitution at the 3-position of the
indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether
or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to JWH-176;
(h) Tetramethylcyclopropanoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl
group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and
whether or not further substituted in the tetramethylcyclopropyl ring to any
extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to UR-144
and XLR-11;
Page 30 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(i) Adamantoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-adamantoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the adamantyl ring system to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to AB-001 and AM-1248; or
(j) Any other synthetic cannabinoid or piperazine which is not approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not
dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal law;
(52) "Synthetic cathinones" means any chemical compound which is not approved by
the United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not
dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal law (not including
bupropion or compounds listed under a different schedule) structurally derived from
2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either phenyl, naphthyl,
or thiophene ring systems, whether or not the compound is further modified in one
(1) or more of the following ways:
(a) By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl, alkylenedioxy,
alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents, whether or not further
substituted in the ring system by one (1) or more other univalent substituents.
Examples of this class include but are not limited to 3,4-
Methylenedioxycathinone (bk-MDA);
(b) By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent. Examples
of this class include but are not limited to 2-methylamino-1-phenylbutan-1-
one (buphedrone);
(c) By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or
methoxybenzyl groups, or by inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a
Page 31 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
cyclic structure. Examples of this class include but are not limited to
Dimethylcathinone, Ethcathinone, and -Pyrrolidinopropiophenone (-PPP);
or
(d) Any other synthetic cathinone which is not approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, is not dispensed or possessed
in accordance with state or federal law;
(53) "Synthetic drugs" means any synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines or any synthetic
cathinones;
(54) "Telehealth" has the same meaning it has in KRS 211.332;
(55) "Tetrahydrocannabinols" means synthetic equivalents of the substances contained
in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of the plant Cannabis, sp. or synthetic
substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and
pharmacological activity such as the following:
(a) Delta 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;
(b) Delta 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; and
(c) Delta 3, 4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers;
(56) "Traffic," except as provided in KRS 218A.1431, means to manufacture, distribute,
dispense, sell, transfer, or possess with intent to manufacture, distribute, dispense,
or sell a controlled substance;
(57) "Transfer" means to dispose of a controlled substance to another person without
consideration and not in furtherance of commercial distribution; and
(58) "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for
his or her own use or for the use of a member of his or her household or for
administering to an animal owned by him or her or by a member of his or her
household.
Section 8. KRS 218B.010 is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
Page 32 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(1) "Bona fide practitioner-patient relationship" means a treating or consulting
relationship, during the course of which a medicinal cannabis practitioner has:
(a) Completed an initial in-person examination and assessment of the patient's
medical history and current medical condition which shall include a review
of:
1. The patient's medical records for the previous twelve (12) months;
2. All other available medical records relevant to the patient's qualifying
medical condition;
3. Any medications that the patient is currently taking; and
4. Any other possible risks or side effects that may be associated with the
use of medicinal cannabis;
(b) Consulted with the patient with respect to the possible medical, therapeutic,
and palliative properties of medicinal cannabis;
(c) Advised the patient of the possible risks and side effects associated with the
use of medicinal cannabis, including possible interactions between medicinal
cannabis and any other drug or medication that the patient is taking at that
time; and
(d) Established an expectation that he or she will provide follow-up care and
treatment to the patient in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated pursuant to KRS 218B.050(10);
(2) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(3) "Cannabis business" means an entity licensed under this chapter as a cultivator,
dispensary, processor, producer, or safety compliance facility;
(4) "Cannabis business agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee,
volunteer, or agent of a cannabis business;
(5) "Cardholder" means:
(a) A registered qualified patient, designated caregiver, or visiting qualified
Page 33 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
patient who has applied for, obtained, and possesses a valid registry
identification card issued by the cabinet; or
(b) A visiting qualified patient who has obtained and possesses:
1. A valid out-of-state registry identification card; and
2. Documentation of having been diagnosed with a qualifying medical
condition;
(6) "Cultivator" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085, and
218B.090;
(7) "Cultivator agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer,
or agent of a cultivator;
(8) "Designated caregiver" means a person who has registered as such with the cabinet
under KRS 218B.055 and 218B.060;
(9) "Dispensary" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085,
and 218B.090;
(10) "Dispensary agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer,
or agent of a dispensary;
(11) "Disqualifying felony offense" means:
(a) A felony offense that resulted in the person being classified by the
Department of Corrections as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401; or
(b) A violation of a state or federal controlled substance law that was classified as
a felony in the jurisdiction where the person was convicted, except:
1. An offense for which the sentence, including any term of probation,
incarceration, or supervised release, was completed five (5) or more
years earlier; or
2. An offense that, as determined by the cabinet, consisted of conduct for
which this chapter would likely have prevented a conviction, but the
conduct either occurred prior to the enactment of this chapter or was
Page 34 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
prosecuted by an authority other than the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(12) "Enclosed, locked facility" means an indoor growing space such as a room,
greenhouse, building, or other indoor enclosed area that is maintained and operated
by a cultivator or producer and is equipped with locks and other security devices
that permit access only by authorized agents of the cultivator or producer, as
required by the cabinet;
(13) "Growth area" has the same meaning as an enclosed, locked facility;
(14) "Marijuana" has the same meaning as in KRS 218A.010;
(15) "Medicinal cannabis":
(a) Means marijuana as defined in KRS 218A.010 when cultivated, harvested,
processed, produced, transported, dispensed, distributed, sold, possessed, or
used in accordance with this chapter;
(b) Includes medicinal cannabis products and raw plant material; and
(c) Does not include[ industrial] hemp,[ or] industrial hemp products, and hemp-
derived cannabinoid products as defined in Section 1 of this Act[KRS
260.850]; and
(16) "Medicinal cannabis accessories" means any equipment, product, or material of any
kind which is used, intended for use, or designed for use in the preparing, storing,
using, or consuming medicinal cannabis in accordance with this chapter;
(17) "Medicinal cannabis practitioner" means a physician or an advanced practice
registered nurse who is authorized to prescribe controlled substances under KRS
314.042, who is authorized by his or her state licensing board to provide written
certifications pursuant to KRS 218B.050;
(18) "Medicinal cannabis product":
(a) Means any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation
of any part of the plant Cannabis sp., its seeds or its resin; or any compound,
mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of these substances when
Page 35 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
cultivated, harvested, processed, produced, transported, dispensed, distributed,
sold, possessed, or used in accordance with this chapter; and
(b) Does not include industrial hemp and hemp-derived cannabinoid products
products as defined in Section 1 of this Act[KRS 260.850];
(19) "Minor" means a person less than eighteen (18) years of age;
(20) "Out-of-state registry identification card" means a registry identification card, or an
equivalent document, that was issued pursuant to the laws of another state, district,
territory, commonwealth, or insular possession of the United States;
(21) "Processor" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085, and
218B.090;
(22) "Processor agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer, or
agent of a processor;
(23) "Producer" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085, and
218B.090;
(24) "Producer agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer, or
agent of a producer;
(25) "Qualified patient" means a person who has obtained a written certification from a
medicinal cannabis practitioner with whom he or she has a bona fide practitioner-
patient relationship;
(26) "Qualifying medical condition" means:
(a) Any type or form of cancer regardless of stage;
(b) Chronic, severe, intractable, or debilitating pain;
(c) Epilepsy or any other intractable seizure disorder;
(d) Multiple sclerosis, muscle spasms, or spasticity;
(e) Chronic nausea or cyclical vomiting syndrome that has proven resistant to
other conventional medical treatments;
(f) Post-traumatic stress disorder; and
Page 36 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(g) Any other medical condition or disease for which the Kentucky Center for
Cannabis established in KRS 164.983, or its successor, determines that
sufficient scientific data and evidence exists to demonstrate that an individual
diagnosed with that condition or disease is likely to receive medical,
therapeutic, or palliative benefits from the use of medicinal cannabis;
(27) "Raw plant material":
(a) Means the trichome-covered part of the female plant Cannabis sp. or any
mixture of shredded leaves, stems, seeds, and flowers of the Cannabis sp.
plant; and
(b) Does not include plant material obtained from[ industrial] hemp as defined in
Section 1 of this Act[KRS 260.850];
(28) "Registered qualified patient" means a qualified patient who has applied for,
obtained, and possesses a valid registry identification card issued by the cabinet;
(29) "Registry identification card" means a document issued by the cabinet that
identifies a person as a registered qualified patient, visiting qualified patient, or
designated caregiver;
(30) "Safety compliance facility" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080,
218B.085, and 218B.090;
(31) "Safety compliance facility agent" means a principal officer, board member,
employee, volunteer, or agent of a safety compliance facility;
(32) "Seedling" means a medicinal cannabis plant that has no flowers and is not taller
than eight (8) inches;
(33) "Serious violation" means:
(a) Any violation of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated
thereunder that is capable of causing death or which causes serious and
prolonged disfigurement, prolonged impairment of health, or prolonged loss
or impairment of the function of any bodily organ;
Page 37 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(b) The diversion of medicinal cannabis for use not regulated pursuant to this
chapter; or
(c) Any act that would constitute a violation of KRS 218A.1421;
(34) "Smoking" means the inhalation of smoke produced from the combustion of raw
plant material when ignited by a flame;
(35) "State licensing board" means:
(a) The Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure; or
(b) The Kentucky Board of Nursing;
(36) "Telehealth" has the same meaning as in KRS 211.332;
(37) "Use of medicinal cannabis":
(a) Includes the acquisition, administration, possession, transfer, transportation,
or consumption of medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis accessories by a
cardholder in accordance with this chapter; and
(b) Does not include:
1. Cultivation of marijuana by a cardholder;
2. The use or consumption of marijuana by smoking;[ or]
3. The use of[ industrial] hemp,[ or] industrial hemp products, and hemp-
derived cannabinoid products as defined in Section 1 of this Act[KRS
260.850];
(38) "Visiting qualified patient" means a person who has registered as such through the
cabinet as required under this chapter or who possesses a valid out-of-state registry
identification card and documentation of having been diagnosed with a qualifying
medical condition; and
(39) "Written certification" means a document dated and signed by a medicinal cannabis
practitioner, that:
(a) States, that in the medicinal cannabis practitioner's professional medical
opinion, the patient may receive medical, therapeutic, or palliative benefit
Page 38 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
from the use of medicinal cannabis;
(b) Specifies the qualifying medical condition or conditions for which the
medicinal cannabis practitioner believes the patient may receive medical,
therapeutic, or palliative benefit; and
(c) Affirms that the medicinal cannabis practitioner has a bona fide practitioner-
patient relationship with the patient.
Section 9. KRS 218B.015 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Nothing in ]This chapter shall not be construed as applying to[ industrial] hemp,[
or] industrial hemp, or hemp-derived cannabinoid products as defined in Section 1
of this Act[KRS 260.850].
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and except as provided in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section and KRS 218B.035:
(a) The use of medicinal cannabis by a cardholder shall be considered lawful if
done in accordance with this chapter and any administrative regulations
promulgated thereunder;
(b) The acquisition, blending, cultivation, delivery, distribution, manufacturing,
manipulation, packaging for sale, preparation, possession, sale, testing,
transportation, or transfer of medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis
accessories by a cannabis business or cannabis business agent shall be
considered lawful if done in accordance with this chapter and any
administrative regulations promulgated thereunder;
(c) A registered qualified patient or visiting qualified patient shall not be
considered to be under the influence of medicinal cannabis solely because of
the presence of tetrahydrocannabinol metabolites, including but not limited to
the cannabinoid carboxy THC, which is also known as THC-COOH;
(d) A medicinal cannabis practitioner shall not be subject, under the laws of the
Commonwealth, to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied
Page 39 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
any right or privilege, including but not limited to a civil penalty or
disciplinary action by a state licensing board or by any other occupational or
professional licensing board, solely for providing written certifications or for
otherwise stating that, in the medicinal cannabis practitioner's professional
opinion, a patient may receive medical, therapeutic, or palliative benefit from
the use of medicinal cannabis, if done in accordance with this chapter;
(e) An attorney shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to
arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege,
including but not limited to a civil penalty or disciplinary action by the
Kentucky Court of Justice, Kentucky Bar Association, or by any other
professional licensing board, solely for providing an individual or cannabis
business with legal assistance related to activity that is no longer subject to
criminal penalties under state law pursuant to this chapter;[ and]
(f) A[No] person shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to
arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege,
including but not limited to a civil penalty or disciplinary action by an
occupational or professional licensing board, solely for providing assistance
or services, including but not limited to accounting services, financial
services, security services, or business consulting services, to any individual
or cannabis business related to activity that is no longer subject to criminal
penalties under state law pursuant to this chapter; and
(g) The Cabinet shall promulgate an emergency administrative regulation in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to permit the transfer or sale of hemp
floral material from a hemp cultivator licensed by the Kentucky Department
of Agriculture to a medical cannabis licensed processor, producer, or
dispensary.
(3) [Nothing in ]Subsection (2) of this section shall not be construed or interpreted to:
Page 40 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(a) Prohibit the arrest, prosecution, or imposition of any other penalty arising
from but not limited to breach of contract, breach of fiduciary duty,
negligence, or engaging in criminal activity that would constitute a felony or
misdemeanor; or
(b) Prevent a medicinal cannabis practitioner from being subject to administrative
penalties imposed by his or her state licensing board for any violation of this
chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated thereunder.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section and any other provision of law to the
contrary, a cardholder who is licensed under KRS Chapter 311 or KRS Chapter 314
may be subject to intervention or disciplinary action by his or her state licensing
board if:
(a) There is probable cause to believe that the cardholder has become impaired
by, or otherwise abused, medicinal cannabis; or
(b) The cardholder has a medically diagnosable disease that is characterized by
chronic, habitual, or periodic use of medicinal cannabis resulting in
interference with the cardholder's professional, social, or economic functions
in the community or the loss of powers of self-control regarding the use of
medicinal cannabis.
Section 10. KRS 241.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS Chapters 241 to 244, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Alcohol" means ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl or spirit of wine, from
whatever source or by whatever process it is produced;
(2) "Alcoholic beverage" means every liquid, solid, powder, or crystal, whether
patented or not, containing alcohol in an amount in excess of more than one percent
(1%) of alcohol by volume, which is fit for beverage purposes. It includes every
spurious or imitation liquor sold as, or under any name commonly used for,
alcoholic beverages, whether containing any alcohol or not. It does not include the
Page 41 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
following products:
(a) Medicinal preparations manufactured in accordance with formulas prescribed
by the United States Pharmacopoeia, National Formulary, or the American
Institute of Homeopathy;
(b) Patented, patent, and proprietary medicines;
(c) Toilet, medicinal, and antiseptic preparations and solutions;
(d) Flavoring extracts and syrups;
(e) Denatured alcohol or denatured rum;
(f) Vinegar and preserved sweet cider;
(g) Wine for sacramental purposes; and
(h) Alcohol unfit for beverage purposes that is to be sold for legitimate external
use;
(3) (a) "Alcohol vaporizing device" or "AWOL device" means any device, machine,
or process that mixes liquor, spirits, or any other alcohol product with pure
oxygen or by any other means produces a vaporized alcoholic product used
for human consumption;
(b) "Alcohol vaporizing device" or "AWOL device" does not include an inhaler,
nebulizer, atomizer, or other device that is designed and intended by the
manufacturer to dispense a prescribed or over-the-counter medication or a
device installed and used by a licensee under this chapter to demonstrate the
aroma of an alcoholic beverage;
(4) "Automobile race track" means a facility primarily used for vehicle racing that has a
seating capacity of at least thirty thousand (30,000) people;
(5) "Barrel-aged and batched cocktail" means an alcoholic beverage that is:
(a) Composed of:
1. Distilled spirits that have been dispensed from their original sealed
container; and
Page 42 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
2. Other ingredients or alcoholic beverages;
(b) Placed into a barrel or container on the premises of a retail licensee; and
(c) Dispensed from the barrel or container as a retail sale by the drink;
(6) "Bed and breakfast" means a one (1) family dwelling unit that:
(a) Has guest rooms or suites used, rented, or hired out for occupancy or that are
occupied for sleeping purposes by persons not members of the single-family
unit;
(b) Holds a permit under KRS Chapter 219; and
(c) Has an innkeeper who resides on the premises or property adjacent to the
premises during periods of occupancy;
(7) "Board" means the State Alcoholic Beverage Control Board created by KRS
241.030;
(8) "Bottle" means any container which is used for holding alcoholic beverages for the
use and sale of alcoholic beverages at retail;
(9) "Brewer" means any person who manufactures malt beverages or owns, occupies,
carries on, works, or conducts any brewery, either alone or through an agent;
(10) "Brewery" means any place or premises where malt beverages are manufactured for
sale, and includes all offices, granaries, mash rooms, cooling rooms, vaults, yards,
and storerooms connected with the premises; or where any part of the process of the
manufacture of malt beverages is carried on; or where any apparatus connected with
manufacture is kept or used; or where any of the products of brewing or
fermentation are stored or kept;
(11) "Building containing licensed premises" means the licensed premises themselves
and includes the land, tract of land, or parking lot in which the premises are
contained, and any part of any building connected by direct access or by an
entrance which is under the ownership or control of the licensee by lease holdings
or ownership;
Page 43 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(12) "Cannabinoid" has the meaning as in Section 1 of this Act[means a compound
found in the hemp plant Cannabis sativa L. from a United States Department of
Agriculture-sanctioned domestic hemp production program and does not include
cannabinoids derived from any other substance];
(13) "Cannabis-infused beverage" has the meaning as in Section 1 of this Act[:
(a) Means a properly permitted adult-use cannabinoid liquid product intended for
human consumption that has intoxicating properties that change the function
of the nervous system and results in alterations of perception, cognition, or
behavior and shall not contain more than five (5) milligrams of intoxicating
adult-use cannabinoids per twelve (12) ounce serving; and
(b) Shall not include:
1. Medicinal cannabis regulated under KRS Chapter 218B;
2. Any type of hemp tincture; and
3. Any product containing solely nonintoxicating cannabinoids];
(14) "Caterer" means a person operating a food service business that prepares food in a
licensed and inspected commissary, transports the food and alcoholic beverages to
the caterer's designated and inspected banquet hall or to an agreed location, and
serves the food and alcoholic beverages pursuant to an agreement with another
person;
(15) "Charitable organization" means a nonprofit entity recognized as exempt from
federal taxation under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. sec.
501(c), or any organization having been established and continuously operating
within the Commonwealth of Kentucky for charitable purposes for three (3) years
and which expends at least sixty percent (60%) of its gross revenue exclusively for
religious, educational, literary, civic, fraternal, or patriotic purposes;
(16) "Cider" means any fermented fruit-based beverage containing seven percent (7%)
or more alcohol by volume and includes hard cider and perry cider;
Page 44 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(17) "City administrator" means city alcoholic beverage control administrator;
(18) "Commercial airport" means an airport through which more than five hundred
thousand (500,000) passengers arrive or depart annually;
(19) (a) "Commercial quadricycle" means a vehicle equipped with a minimum of ten
(10) pairs of fully operative pedals for propulsion by means of human
muscular power and which:
1. Has four (4) wheels;
2. Is operated in a manner similar to that of a bicycle;
3. Is equipped with a minimum of thirteen (13) seats for passengers;
4. Has a unibody design;
5. Is equipped with a minimum of four (4) hydraulically operated brakes;
6. Is used for commercial tour purposes;
7. Is operated by the vehicle owner or an employee of the owner; and
8. Has an electrical assist system that shall only be used when traveling to
or from its storage location while not carrying passengers.
(b) A "commercial quadricycle" is not a motor vehicle as defined in KRS 186.010
or 189.010;
(20) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage
Control;
(21) "Consumer" means a person, persons, or business organization who purchases
alcoholic beverages and who:
(a) Does not hold a license or permit issued by the department;
(b) Purchases the alcoholic beverages for personal consumption only and not for
resale;
(c) Is of lawful drinking age; and
(d) Receives the alcoholic beverages in territory where the alcoholic beverages
may be lawfully sold or received;
Page 45 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(22) "Convention center" means any facility which, in its usual and customary business,
provides seating for a minimum of one thousand (1,000) people and offers
convention facilities and related services for seminars, training and educational
purposes, trade association meetings, conventions, or civic and community events
or for plays, theatrical productions, or cultural exhibitions;
(23) "Convicted" and "conviction" means a finding of guilt resulting from a plea of
guilty, the decision of a court, or the finding of a jury, irrespective of a
pronouncement of judgment or the suspension of the judgment;
(24) "County administrator" means county alcoholic beverage control administrator;
(25) "Department" means the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control;
(26) "Dining car" means a railroad passenger car that serves meals to consumers on any
railroad or Pullman car company;
(27) "Discount in the usual course of business" means price reductions, rebates, refunds,
and discounts given by wholesalers to distilled spirits and wine retailers pursuant to
an agreement made at the time of the sale of the merchandise involved and are
considered a part of the sales transaction, constituting reductions in price pursuant
to the terms of the sale, irrespective of whether the quantity discount was:
(a) Prorated and allowed on each delivery;
(b) Given in a lump sum after the entire quantity of merchandise purchased had
been delivered; or
(c) Based on dollar volume or on the quantity of merchandise purchased;
(28) "Distilled spirits" or "spirits" means any product capable of being consumed by a
human being which contains alcohol obtained by distilling, mixed with water or
other substances in solution, except wine, hard cider, and malt beverages;
(29) "Distiller" means any person who is engaged in the business of manufacturing
distilled spirits at any distillery in the state and is registered in the Office of the
Collector of Internal Revenue for the United States at Louisville, Kentucky;
Page 46 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(30) "Distillery" means any place or premises where distilled spirits are manufactured
for sale, and which are registered in the office of any collector of internal revenue
for the United States. It includes any United States government bonded warehouse;
(31) "Distributor" means any person who distributes malt beverages for the purpose of
being sold at retail;
(32) "Dry" means a territory in which a majority of the electorate voted to prohibit all
forms of retail alcoholic beverage sales through a local option election held under
KRS Chapter 242;
(33) "Election" means:
(a) An election held for the purpose of taking the sense of the people as to the
application or discontinuance of alcoholic beverage sales under KRS Chapter
242; or
(b) Any other election not pertaining to alcoholic beverages;
(34) "Horse racetrack" means a facility licensed to conduct a horse race meeting under
KRS Chapter 230;
(35) "Hotel" means a hotel, motel, or inn for accommodation of the traveling public,
designed primarily to serve transient patrons;
(36) "Investigator" means any employee or agent of the department who is regularly
employed and whose primary function is to travel from place to place for the
purpose of visiting licensees, and any employee or agent of the department who is
assigned, temporarily or permanently, by the commissioner to duty outside the main
office of the department at Frankfort, in connection with the administration of
alcoholic beverage statutes;
(37) "License" means any license issued pursuant to KRS Chapters 241 to 244;
(38) "Licensee" means any person to whom a license has been issued, pursuant to KRS
Chapters 241 to 244;
(39) "Limited restaurant" means:
Page 47 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(a) A facility where the usual and customary business is the preparation and
serving of meals to consumers, which has a bona fide kitchen facility, which
receives at least seventy percent (70%) of its food and alcoholic beverage
receipts from the sale of food, which maintains a minimum seating capacity of
fifty (50) persons for dining, which has no open bar, which requires that
alcoholic beverages be sold in conjunction with the sale of a meal, and which
is located in a wet or moist territory under KRS 242.1244; or
(b) A facility where the usual and customary business is the preparation and
serving of meals to consumers, which has a bona fide kitchen facility, which
receives at least seventy percent (70%) of its food and alcoholic beverage
receipts from the sale of food, which maintains a minimum seating capacity of
one hundred (100) persons of dining, and which is located in a wet or moist
territory under KRS 242.1244;
(40) "Local administrator" means a city alcoholic beverage control administrator, county
alcoholic beverage control administrator, or urban-county alcoholic beverage
control administrator;
(41) "Malt beverage" means any fermented undistilled alcoholic beverage of any name
or description, manufactured from malt wholly or in part, or from any substitute for
malt, and includes weak cider;
(42) "Manufacture" means distill, rectify, brew, bottle, and operate a winery;
(43) "Manufacturer" means a winery, distiller, rectifier, or brewer, and any other person
engaged in the production or bottling of alcoholic beverages;
(44) "Marina" means a dock or basin providing moorings for boats and offering supply,
repair, or other services for remuneration;
(45) "Minor" means any person who is not twenty-one (21) years of age or older;
(46) "Moist" means a territory in which a majority of the electorate voted to permit
limited alcoholic beverage sales by any one (1) or a combination of special limited
Page 48 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
local option elections authorized by KRS Chapter 242;
(47) "Population" means the population figures established by the federal decennial
census for a census year or the current yearly population estimates prepared by the
Kentucky State Data Center, Urban Studies Center of the University of Louisville,
Louisville, Kentucky, for all other years;
(48) "Premises" means the land and building in and upon which any business regulated
by alcoholic beverage statutes is operated or carried on. "Premises" shall not
include as a single unit two (2) or more separate businesses of one (1) owner on the
same lot or tract of land, in the same or in different buildings if physical and
permanent separation of the premises is maintained, excluding employee access by
keyed entry and emergency exits equipped with crash bars, and each has a separate
public entrance accessible directly from the sidewalk or parking lot. Any licensee
holding an alcoholic beverage license on July 15, 1998, shall not, by reason of this
subsection, be ineligible to continue to hold his or her license or obtain a renewal,
of the license;
(49) "Primary source of supply" or "supplier" means the distiller, winery, brewer,
producer, owner of the commodity at the time it becomes a marketable product,
bottler, or authorized agent of the brand owner. In the case of imported products,
the primary source of supply means either the foreign producer, owner, bottler, or
agent of the prime importer from, or the exclusive agent in, the United States of the
foreign distiller, producer, bottler, or owner;
(50) "Private club" means a nonprofit social, fraternal, military, or political organization,
club, or nonprofit or for-profit entity maintaining or operating a club room, club
rooms, or premises from which the general public is excluded;
(51) "Private selection event" means a private event with a licensed distiller during
which participating consumers, retail licensees, wholesalers, distributors, or a
distillery's own representatives select a single barrel or a blend of barrels of the
Page 49 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
distiller's products to be specially packaged for the participants;
(52) "Private selection package" means a bottle of distilled spirits sourced from the
barrel or barrels selected by participating consumers, retail licensees, wholesalers,
distributors, microbreweries that hold a quota retail drink or quota retail package
license, or a distillery's own representatives during a private selection event;
(53) "Public nuisance" means a condition that endangers safety or health, is offensive to
the senses, or obstructs the free use of property so as to interfere with the
comfortable enjoyment of life or property by a community or neighborhood or by
any considerable number of persons;
(54) "Qualified historic site" means:
(a) A contributing property with dining facilities for at least fifty (50) persons at
tables, booths, or bars where food may be served within a commercial district
listed in the National Register of Historic Places;
(b) A site that is listed as a National Historic Landmark or in the National
Register of Historic Places with dining facilities for at least fifty (50) persons
at tables, booths, or bars where food may be served;
(c) A distillery which is listed as a National Historic Landmark and which
conducts souvenir retail package sales under KRS 243.0305; or
(d) A not-for-profit or nonprofit facility listed on the National Register of Historic
Places;
(55) "Rectifier" means any person who rectifies, purifies, or refines distilled spirits,
malt, or wine by any process other than as provided for on distillery premises, and
every person who, without rectifying, purifying, or refining distilled spirits by
mixing alcoholic beverages with any materials, manufactures any imitations of or
compounds liquors for sale under the name of whiskey, brandy, gin, rum, wine,
spirits, cordials, bitters, or any other name;
(56) "Repackaging" means the placing of alcoholic beverages in any retail container
Page 50 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
irrespective of the material from which the container is made;
(57) "Restaurant" means a facility where the usual and customary business is the
preparation and serving of meals to consumers, that has a bona fide kitchen facility,
and that receives at least fifty percent (50%) of its food and alcoholic beverage
receipts from the sale of food at the premises;
(58) "Retail container" means any bottle, can, barrel, or other container which, without a
separable intermediate container, holds alcoholic beverages and is suitable and
destined for sale to a retail outlet, whether it is suitable for delivery or shipment to
the consumer or not;
(59) "Retail sale" means any sale of alcoholic beverages to a consumer, including those
transactions taking place in person, electronically, online, by mail, or by telephone;
(60) "Retailer" means any licensee who sells and delivers any alcoholic beverage to
consumers, except for manufacturers with limited retail sale privileges and direct
shipper licensees;
(61) "Riverboat" means any boat or vessel with a regular place of mooring in this state
that is licensed by the United States Coast Guard to carry forty (40) or more
passengers for hire on navigable waters in or adjacent to this state;
(62) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter for consideration, and includes all
sales made by any person, whether principal, proprietor, agent, servant, or
employee, of any alcoholic beverage;
(63) "Service bar" means a bar, counter, shelving, or similar structure used for storing or
stocking supplies of alcoholic beverages that is a workstation where employees
prepare alcoholic beverage drinks to be delivered to customers away from the
service bar;
(64) "Sell" includes solicit or receive an order for, keep or expose for sale, keep with
intent to sell, and the delivery of any alcoholic beverage;
(65) "Small farm winery" means a winery whose wine production is not less than two
Page 51 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
hundred fifty (250) gallons and not greater than five hundred thousand (500,000)
gallons in a calendar year;
(66) "Souvenir package" means a special package of distilled spirits available from a
licensed retailer that is:
(a) Available for retail sale at a licensed Kentucky distillery where the distilled
spirits were produced or bottled; or
(b) Available for retail sale at a licensed Kentucky distillery but produced or
bottled at another of that distiller's licensed distilleries in Kentucky;
(67) "State administrator" or "administrator" means the distilled spirits administrator or
the malt beverages administrator, or both, as the context requires;
(68) "State park" means a state park that has a:
(a) Nine (9) or eighteen (18) hole golf course; or
(b) Full-service lodge and dining room;
(69) "Supplemental bar" means a bar, counter, shelving, or similar structure used for
serving and selling distilled spirits or wine by the drink for consumption on the
licensed premises to guests and patrons from additional locations other than the
main bar;
(70) "Territory" means a county, city, district, or precinct;
(71) "Urban-county administrator" means an urban-county alcoholic beverage control
administrator;
(72) "Valid identification document" means an unexpired, government-issued form of
identification that contains the photograph and date of birth of the individual to
whom it is issued;
(73) "Vehicle" means any device or animal used to carry, convey, transport, or otherwise
move alcoholic beverages or any products, equipment, or appurtenances used to
manufacture, bottle, or sell these beverages;
(74) "Vintage distilled spirit" means:
Page 52 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(a) A private selection package; or
(b) A package or packages of distilled spirits that:
1. Are in their original manufacturer's unopened container;
2. Are not owned by a distillery; and
3. Are not otherwise available for purchase from a licensed wholesaler
within the Commonwealth;
(75) (a) "Vintage distilled spirits seller" means a nonlicensed person at least twenty-
one (21) years of age who is:
1. An administrator, executor, receiver, or other fiduciary who receives and
sells vintage distilled spirits in execution of the person's fiduciary
capacity;
2. A creditor who receives or takes possession of vintage distilled spirits as
security for, or in payment of, debt, in whole or in part;
3. A public officer or court official who levies on vintage distilled spirits
under order or process of any court or magistrate to sell the vintage
distilled spirits in satisfaction of the order or process; or
4. Any other person not engaged in the business of selling alcoholic
beverages.
(b) "Vintage distilled spirits seller" does not mean:
1. A person selling alcoholic beverages as part of an approved KRS
243.630 transfer; or
2. A person selling alcoholic beverages as authorized by KRS 243.540;
(76) "Warehouse" means any place in which alcoholic beverages are housed or stored;
(77) "Weak cider" means any fermented fruit-based beverage containing more than one
percent (1%) but less than seven percent (7%) alcohol by volume;
(78) "Wet" means a territory in which a majority of the electorate voted to permit all
forms of retail alcoholic beverage sales by a local option election under KRS
Page 53 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
242.050 or 242.125 on the following question: "Are you in favor of the sale of
alcoholic beverages in (name of territory)?";
(79) "Wholesale sale" means a sale to any person for the purpose of resale;
(80) "Wholesaler" means any person who distributes alcoholic beverages for the purpose
of being sold at retail, but it shall not include a subsidiary of a manufacturer or
cooperative of a retail outlet;
(81) "Wine" means the product of the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juices of
fruits, with the usual processes of manufacture and normal additions, and includes
champagne and sparkling and fortified wine of an alcoholic content not to exceed
twenty-four percent (24%) by volume. It includes sake, cider, hard cider, and perry
cider and also includes preparations or mixtures vended in retail containers if these
preparations or mixtures contain not more than fifteen percent (15%) of alcohol by
volume. It does not include weak cider; and
(82) "Winery" means any place or premises in which wine is manufactured from any
fruit, or brandies are distilled as a by-product of wine or other fruit, or cordials are
compounded, except a place or premises that manufactures wine for sacramental
purposes exclusively.
Section 11. KRS 243.030 is amended to read as follows:
The following licenses that authorize traffic in distilled spirits and wine and in cannabis-
infused beverages may be issued by the distilled spirits administrator. Licenses that
authorize traffic in all alcoholic beverages may be issued by both the distilled spirits
administrator and malt beverages administrator. The licenses and their accompanying
fees are as follows:
(1) Distiller's license:
(a) Class A, per annum .............................................................................$3,090.00
(b) Class B (craft distillery), per annum ....................................................$1,000.00
(c) Off-premises retail sales outlet, per annum ............................................$300.00
Page 54 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(2) Rectifier's license:
(a) Class A, per annum .............................................................................$2,580.00
(b) Class B (craft rectifier), per annum ........................................................$825.00
(3) Winery license, per annum ..........................................................................$1,030.00
(4) Small farm winery license, per annum ...........................................................$110.00
(a) Small farm winery off-premises retail license, per annum ......................$30.00
(5) Wholesaler's license, per annum ..................................................................$2,060.00
(6) Quota retail package license, per annum .........................................................$570.00
(7) Quota retail drink license, per annum ..............................................................$620.00
(8) Transporter's license, per annum ....................................................................$210.00
(9) Special nonbeverage alcohol license, per annum .............................................$60.00
(10) Special agent's or solicitor's license, per annum ...............................................$30.00
(11) Bottling house or bottling house storage license, per annum ......... .............$1,030.00
(12) Special temporary license, per event ..............................................................$100.00
(13) Special Sunday retail drink license, per annum ...............................................$520.00
(14) Caterer's license, per annum ...........................................................................$830.00
(15) Special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license, per event ...................$100.00
(16) Extended hours supplemental license, per annum .......................................$2,060.00
(17) Hotel in-room license, per annum ...................................................................$210.00
(18) Air transporter license, per annum ..................................................................$520.00
(19) Sampling license, per annum ...........................................................................$110.00
(20) Replacement or duplicate license ......................................................................$25.00
(21) Entertainment destination center license:
(a) When the licensee is a city, county, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, charter county government, or
unified local government, per annum .................................................$2,577.00
(b) All other licensees, per annum ............................................................$7,730.00
Page 55 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(22) Limited restaurant license, per annum .............................................................$780.00
(23) Limited golf course license, per annum ...........................................................$720.00
(24) Small farm winery wholesaler's license, per annum .......................................$110.00
(25) Qualified historic site license, per annum ....................................................$1,030.00
(26) Nonquota type 1 license, per annum ........................ ...................................$4,120.00
(27) Nonquota type 2 license, per annum ................................................................$830.00
(28) Nonquota type 3 license, per annum ................................................................$310.00
(29) Distilled spirits and wine storage license, per annum ..................................$620.00
(30) Out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier's license, per annum ...........$1,550.00
(31) Limited out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier's
license, per annum ..........................................................................................$260.00
(32) Authorized public consumption license, per annum ........................................$250.00
(33) Direct shipper Type A license, per annum.......................................................$100.00
(34) Limited nonquota package license, per annum ................................................$300.00
(35) Vintage distilled spirits license, per annum .....................................................$300.00
(36) Cannabis-infused beverage retail package license, per annum ..... $500.00[$2,000.00]
(37) Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license, per annum ........................$1,000.00
(38) Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license,
supplemental, per annum ..............................................................................$1,000.00
(39) Direct shipper Type B license, per annum ....................................................$1,000.00
(40) A nonrefundable fee of sixty dollars ($60) shall be charged to process each new
transitional license pursuant to KRS 243.045.
(41) Other special licenses the board finds necessary for the proper regulation and
control of the traffic in distilled spirits and wine and provides for by administrative
regulation. In establishing the amount of license taxes that are required to be fixed
by the board, it shall have regard for the value of the privilege granted.
(42) The fee for each of the first five (5) supplemental bar licenses shall be the same as
Page 56 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
the fee for the primary retail drink license. There shall be no charge for each
supplemental license issued in excess of five (5) to the same licensee at the same
premises.
A nonrefundable application fee of fifty dollars ($50) shall be charged to process each
new application under this section, except for subsections (4), (8), (9), (10), (12), (15),
(19), and (20) of this section. The application fee shall be applied to the licensing fee if
the license is issued; otherwise it shall be retained by the department.
Section 12. KRS 260.852 is amended to read as follows:
It is the declared policy of the Commonwealth that hemp is a viable agricultural crop in
the Commonwealth. The purposes of KRS 260.850 to 260.869 are to:
(1) Promote the research and study methods of cultivating, processing, and marketing
hemp;
(2) Promote the expansion of the Commonwealth's hemp industry[ to the maximum
extent permitted by federal law] by allowing citizens of the Commonwealth to
cultivate, handle, or process hemp and hemp products for commercial purposes; and
(3) Move the Commonwealth and its citizens to the forefront of the hemp industry.
Section 13. KRS 260.858 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, it is lawful for a
licensee, or his or her agent, to cultivate, handle, or process hemp or hemp products
in the Commonwealth.
(2) It is unlawful for a person who does not hold a license issued by the department, or
who is not an agent of a licensee, to cultivate, handle,[ process,] or market living
hemp plants or viable seeds, leaf materials, or floral materials derived from hemp.
Penalties for persons who cultivate, handle, process, or market living hemp plants
or viable seeds, leaf materials, or floral materials derived from hemp without a
license are the same as those penalties that are applicable to persons who violate
KRS Chapter 218A, relating to marijuana.
Page 57 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(3) [It is unlawful for a person who does not hold a license issued by the department, or
who is not an agent of a licensee, to possess hemp extract material having a[ delta-
9] tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in excess of three-tenths of one percent
(0.3%). Penalties for persons who possess such hemp extract materials without a
license are the same as those penalties that are applicable to persons who violate
KRS Chapter 218A, relating to marijuana.
(4) Nothing in ]This chapter shall not authorize[authorizes] any person to violate any
federal or state law or regulation.
Section 14. KRS 260.862 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other powers vested in it by law, the department shall have the
authority and power to promulgate administrative regulations to:
(a) License persons who wish to cultivate, handle,[ process,] or market hemp;
(b) Prescribe rules for a university's participation in, or affiliation with, any hemp
program;
(c) Prescribe sampling and testing procedures to ensure that hemp and hemp
products cultivated, handled,[ processed,] or marketed under the authority of
this section do not exceed the concentration levels defined in federal law as it
currently exists or as it may be subsequently amended;
(d) Prescribe rules for a licensed cultivator or licensed handler to sell hemp
floral material to a licensed medical cannabis processor, producer, or
dispensary as defined in KRS Chapter 218B so long as the harvested floral
material has been grown within the legal framework of the department's
hemp program and is tested in accordance with the Commonwealth's
medical cannabis program[Define classes or categories of hemp products
that are eligible for sale, transfer, or distribution to members of the public];
and
(e) Establish a schedule of nonrefundable fees for applicants and licensees.
Page 58 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
(2) (a) A[No] person shall not cultivate, handle,[ process,] or market hemp in the
Commonwealth unless the person holds a license issued by the department.
(b) Any person seeking to cultivate hemp shall provide to the department the
legal description and global positioning coordinates sufficient for locating the
fields or greenhouses to be used to grow hemp.
(c) Any person seeking to cultivate[ or process] hemp shall provide to the
department prior written consent allowing representatives of the department,
the Department of Kentucky State Police, and other state and local law
enforcement agencies to enter onto all premises where hemp is cultivated,
processed, or stored for the purpose of conducting physical inspections or
ensuring compliance with the requirements of KRS 260.850 to 260.869 and
administrative regulations promulgated by the department.
(d) An applicant for a license issued by the department shall submit to and pay for
an annual criminal background check conducted by the Department of
Kentucky State Police or another state or federal law enforcement agency or
another entity selected by the department.
(e) A[No] person who has been convicted of any felony or any drug-related
misdemeanor or violation in the previous ten (10) years from the date of
application shall not be eligible to obtain a license, provided, however, that:
1. A person who was growing hemp lawfully with a license, registration,
or authorization under a pilot program authorized by Section 7606 of the
Agricultural Act of 2014, 7 U.S.C. sec. 5940, shall be eligible to obtain
a license to grow hemp; and
2. A person who was lawfully growing hemp under Section 7606 of the
Agricultural Act of 2014 before December 20, 2018, and was convicted
prior to December 20, 2018, shall be eligible to obtain a license to grow
hemp.
Page 59 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1925
Section 15. Whereas proper regulation of intoxicating products is vitally
important to public safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect
upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 60 of 60
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:51 AM Jacketed